Washington statutes.
RCW 36.27.045

Employment of legal interns.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to prevent a prosecuting attorney from employing legal interns as otherwise authorized by statute or court rule.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 6 s 1.]